Maryland, session 2025, SB0259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–303.
[(h) (1) The requirements of this subsection do not apply if a local board is
creating a new precinct or changing a precinct boundary or polling place under subsection
(f) of this section during the period beginning 21 days before election day through election
day.
(2) Each local board shall:
– 1 –

Ch. 281 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) maintain a contact list of individuals and organizations who
wish to be notified about local board meetings at which proposed changes to the locations of
polling places will be discussed; and
(ii) enable individuals and organizations to register for the contact
list maintained in accordance with item (i) of this paragraph.
(3) A local board may not vote to change the location of a polling place
unless the local board first:
(i) holds a meeting to discuss the proposed change; and
(ii) provides an opportunity for interested individuals and
organizations to testify on the proposed change at the meeting.
(4) At least 14 days before the meeting required under paragraph (3)(i) of
this subsection, the local board shall provide written notice of the meeting to:
(i) each individual and organization on the contact list maintained
in accordance with paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection; and
(ii) the following elected officials if the official is elected by eligible
voters residing in the precinct containing either the current polling place location or the
proposed polling place location:
1. the mayor;
2. the county executive;
3. each county commissioner;
4. each county council member;
5. each municipal council member; and
6. each member of the Maryland General Assembly.]
2–303.1.
(a) At least [6] 7 months before each statewide primary election, each local board
shall submit [a polling place plan] AN ELECTION PLAN to the State Board for approval.
(B) AN ELECTION PLAN SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A POLLING PLACE PLAN THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 281
(2) A BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–304 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) AN EARLY VOTING CENTER PLAN THAT MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(4) AN ANALYSIS OF HOW TO MAXIMIZE VOTER PARTICIPATION IN THE
COUNTY AND EACH PRECINCT.
[(b)] (C) (1) A polling place plan shall include:
(1) (I) evidence that the plan complies with § 10–101(a)(2) of this
article; AND
(2) [an analysis of how to maximize voter participation in each precinct;]
and
(3)] if the polling place plan proposes to reduce the total number of separate
buildings used as polling places below the total number of separate buildings used as
polling places in the [2018] FIRST STATEWIDE general election HELD AFTER THE MOST
RECENT REDISTRICTING BASED ON THE CENSUS:
(II) THE INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF:
1. IN THE FIRST STATEWIDE ELECTION HELD AFTER A
STATEWIDE REDISTRICTING BASED ON THE CENSUS, THE POLLING PLACE PLAN
PROPOSES TO REDUCE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SEPARATE BUILDINGS USED AS
POLLING PLACES BELOW THE TOTAL NUMBER OF SEPARATE BUILDINGS USED AS
POLLING PLACES IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING GENERAL ELECTION; OR
2. IN ANY STATEWIDE ELECTION OTHER THAN THE FIRST
STATEWIDE ELECTION HELD AFTER A STATEWIDE REDISTRICTING BASED ON THE
CENSUS, THE POLLING PLACE PLAN PROPOSES TO REDUCE THE TOTAL NUMBER OF
SEPARATE BUILDINGS USED AS POLLING PLACES BELOW THE TOTAL NUMBER OF
SEPARATE BUILDINGS USED AS POLLING PLACES IN THE FIRST STATEWIDE GENERAL
ELECTION HELD AFTER THE MOST RECENT STATEWIDE REDISTRICTING BASED ON
THE CENSUS.
(2) IF REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
POLLING PLACE PLAN SHALL INCLUDE:
– 3 –

Ch. 281 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) the address and a description of the location of each affected
polling place;
(ii) an analysis of available suitable buildings within the precinct
boundary, including the availability of parking and a determination regarding building
compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(iii) of the voters who cast ballots in each affected precinct in the
three most recent statewide elections:
1. the percentage who voted in person on election day;
2. the percentage who voted by mail;
3. the number who registered to vote on election day; and
4. the number who voted at an early voting center;
(iv) the proximity of the proposed polling place to a dense
concentration of voters in the affected precinct;
(v) the change in the number of registered voters in the affected
precinct from the last statewide election;
(vi) the public transportation options that voters in each affected
precinct could use to access the polling place that would serve the precinct under the plan;
and
(vii) an analysis of the impact on the ability of historically
disenfranchised communities to cast a ballot, including demographic information of the
voters in the affected precinct [from the most recent report published by the Maryland Vital
Statistics Administration].
(D) AN EARLY VOTING CENTER PLAN SHALL TAKE INTO ACCOUNT USE THE
FOLLOWING FACTORS WHEN DETERMINING THE LOCATION OF AN EARLY VOTING
CENTER IN THE COUNTY:
(1) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER TO HISTORICALLY
DISENFRANCHISED COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING CULTURAL GROUPS, ETHNIC
GROUPS, AND MINORITY GROUPS;
(2) PROXIMITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER TO DENSE
CONCENTRATIONS OF VOTERS;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 281
(3) ACCESSIBILITY OF THE EARLY VOTING CENTER BY PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION;
(4) FOR COUNTIES WITH FOUR OR MORE EARLY VOTING CENTERS,
ENSURING EQUITABLE GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF EARLY VOTING CENTERS
THROUGHOUT THE COUNTY; AND
(5) THE USE OF COMMUNITY CENTERS AND PUBLIC GATHERING
PLACES.
(E) (1) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY IF A
LOCAL BOARD IS CREATING A NEW PRECINCT OR CHANGING A PRECINCT BOUNDARY
OR POLLING PLACE UNDER § 2–303(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE DURING THE PERIOD
BEGINNING 21 DAYS BEFORE ELECTION DAY THROUGH ELECTION DAY.
(2) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL:
(I) MAINTAIN A CONTACT LIST OF INDIVIDUALS AND
ORGANIZATIONS WHO WISH TO BE NOTIFIED ABOUT LOCAL BOARD MEETINGS AT
WHICH AN ELECTION PLAN OR ANY PROPOSED CHANGES TO THE LOCATIONS OF
POLLING PLACES WILL BE DISCUSSED; AND
(II) INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT THE PURPOSE OF THE
CONTACT LIST AND HOW TO REGISTER FOR THE LIST IN A CONSPICUOUS LOCATION
ON THE LOCAL BOARD’S WEBSITE.
(3) A LOCAL BOARD MAY NOT VOTE TO ADOPT AN ELECTION PLAN OR
CHANGE THE LOCATION OF A POLLING PLACE UNLESS THE LOCAL BOARD FIRST:
(I) HOLDS A MEETING TO DISCUSS AND VOTE ON THE
PROPOSED ELECTION PLAN OR CHANGE IN THE LOCATION OF A POLLING PLACE; AND
(II) PROVIDES AN OPPORTUNITY FOR INTERESTED INDIVIDUALS
AND ORGANIZATIONS TO PROVIDE WRITTEN OR ORAL TESTIMONY AT THE MEETING
ON THE PROPOSED ELECTION PLAN OR CHANGE IN THE LOCATION OF A POLLING
PLACE.
(4) AT LEAST 14 DAYS BEFORE THE MEETING REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL:
(I) POST THE PROPOSED ELECTION PLAN OR A WRITTEN
DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED CHANGE IN THE LOCATION OF A POLLING PLACE
ON THE LOCAL BOARD’S WEBSITE; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 281 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE MEETING TO:
1. EACH INDIVIDUAL AND ORGANIZATION ON THE
CONTACT LIST MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
2. IF AN ELECTION PLAN WILL BE CONSIDERED AT THE
MEETING, THE ELECTED OFFICIALS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION WHO REPRESENT ALL OR ANY PORTION OF THE COUNTY; OR
3. IF A CHANGE IN THE LOCATION OF A POLLING PLACE
WILL BE CONSIDERED AT THE MEETING, THE ELECTED OFFICIALS SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION WHO REPRESENT THE PRECINCT CONTAINING
EITHER THE CURRENT POLLING PLACE LOCATION OR THE PROPOSED POLLING
PLACE LOCATION.
(5) IF REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(II)2 OR 3 OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE MEETING TO:
(I) THE MAYOR;
(II) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE;
(III) EACH COUNTY COMMISSIONER;
(IV) EACH COUNTY COUNCIL MEMBER;
(V) EACH MUNICIPAL COUNCIL MEMBER; AND
(VI) EACH MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(F) THE LOCAL BOARD SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE BOARD WITH THE
LOCAL BOARD’S ELECTION PLAN ANY WRITTEN TESTIMONY AND A SUMMARY OF ANY
ORAL TESTIMONY ON THE ELECTION PLAN PROVIDED BY THE PUBLIC AT THE
MEETING AT WHICH THE LOCAL BOARD DISCUSSED AND VOTED ON THE ELECTION
PLAN.
[(c)] (E) (G) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL VOTE ON THE ELECTION PLAN
SUBMITTED BY EACH LOCAL BOARD.
(2) The State Board shall approve [a polling place plan] AN ELECTION
PLAN OF A LOCAL BOARD if the [polling place plan] ELECTION PLAN:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 281
(1) (I) complies with the requirements of this section and § 10–101(a)(2)
of this article; [and]
(2) (II) HAS BEEN REVIEWED BY THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR; AND
[(2)] (3) (III) will not negatively affect access to voting for historically
disenfranchised communities.
[(d)] (F) (H) [(1) The State Board shall reject a polling place plan that does not
meet the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.
(2)] If the State Board VOTES ON AN ELECTION PLAN AND [rejects a
polling place plan] DOES NOT APPROVE AN THE ELECTION PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION
(E) (G) OF THIS SECTION, the local board shall submit a revised [polling place plan]
ELECTION PLAN to the State Board within 15 days after the date on which the State Board
rejected VOTED ON the previous plan.
2–304.
(a) (1) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL DEVELOP A BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN
THAT INCLUDES THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF EACH BALLOT DROP BOX IN THE
COUNTY.
(2) A local board shall consider USE the following factors when determining
the location of a ballot drop box:
[(1)] (I) the accessibility of the ballot drop box to historically
disenfranchised communities, including voters with disabilities, cultural groups, ethnic
groups, and minority groups;
[(2)] (II) proximity of the ballot drop box to dense concentrations of voters;
[(3)] (III) accessibility of the ballot drop box by public transportation; AND
[(4)] (IV) equitable GEOGRAPHIC distribution of ballot drop boxes
throughout the county[; and
(5) maximizing voter participation, including through placement of ballot
drop boxes at community centers and public gathering places].
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a local board shall designate locations
in the county at which a ballot drop box will be placed in accordance with the factors set
forth in subsection (a) of this section.
– 7 –

Ch. 281 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) Each local board shall submit the BALLOT DROP BOX PLAN WITH THE
proposed locations in the county for each ballot drop box to the State Administrator for
approval REVIEW.
(2) The State Administrator shall approve a ballot drop box location that
meets the factors established under subsection (a) of this section.
(3) (2) If a proposed ballot drop box [location] PLAN does not meet the
factors LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, BEFORE THE LOCAL BOARD’S
ELECTION PLAN IS SUBMITTED TO THE STATE BOARD FOR APPROVAL UNDER §
2–303.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the State Administrator shall:
(i) require REQUEST that the local board reconsider the proposed
location for one or more ballot drop boxes; and
(ii) provide to the local board a detailed explanation of why the
proposed location does not meet the factors.
(4) (3) If the State Administrator finds that the proposed ballot drop box
locations submitted to the State Administrator after reconsideration by the local board
under paragraph (3) (2) of this subsection do not meet the factors, the State Administrator
may add ballot drop box locations in the county.
10–301.1.
[(c) (1) No later than 6 months before a primary election, the local board in
each county shall, subject to the approval of the State Board, designate each early voting
center in that county.
(2) A local board shall take into account the following factors when
determining the location of an early voting center:
(i) accessibility of the early voting center to historically
disenfranchised communities, including cultural groups, ethnic groups, and minority
groups;
(ii) proximity of the early voting center to dense concentrations of
voters;
(iii) accessibility of the early voting center by public transportation;
(iv) ensuring equitable distribution of early voting centers
throughout the county; and
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 281
(v) maximizing voter participation, including through the use of
community centers and public gathering places as locations for early voting centers.]
[(d)] (C) Each early voting center shall be open for voting as follows:
(1) beginning the second Thursday before a primary or general election
through the Thursday before the election; and
(2) during the hours between 7 a.m. and 8 p.m. each early voting day.
[(e)] (D) (1) Each early voting center shall satisfy the requirements of §
10–101 of this title.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the public official
responsible for the use of a public building requested by a local board for an early voting
center shall make the public building available to the local board in accordance with §
10–101(a)(3) of this title.
(3) (i) The State Board shall adopt regulations that establish an
appeals process for public officials responsible for public buildings requested for use under
paragraph (2) of this subsection to contest the availability of the public building during the
period of time the building would be used as an early voting center.
(ii) The appeals process established under this paragraph shall
include:
1. an initial appeal to the local board that selected the public
building for use as an early voting center;
2. an opportunity for a public official to be heard publicly at
a meeting of the local board before the local board makes a decision on the appeal;
3. an appeal by a public official of an adverse decision of the
local board to the State Board;
4. an opportunity for a public official to be heard publicly at
a meeting of the State Board before the State Board makes a final decision on the appeal;
and
5. a final decision at least 8 months before the primary
election for which the local board seeks to use the public building as an early voting center.
(iii) The decision of the State Board regarding an appeal under this
paragraph is final.
– 9 –

Ch. 281 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(f)] (E) Beginning 30 days prior to each early voting period the State Board and
each local board shall undertake steps to inform the public about early voting and the
location of early voting centers in each county, including:
(1) a series of public service media announcements;
(2) mailings to all registered voters in each county; and
(3) other measures as appropriate.
[(g)] (F) Except as expressly provided in this section, any provision of this article
that applies to voting on election day also applies to early voting.
[(h)] (G) The State Board shall adopt regulations and guidelines in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the conduct of early voting.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 10 –